California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
======================================================================
  Food and Agricultural Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: September 26, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the “Food and Agricultural Code.”

(History: Amended By Stats. 1972, Ch. 225.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the provisions of this code are enacted in the exercise of the power of this state for the purposes of promoting and protecting the agricultural industry of the state and for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare. In all civil actions the provisions of this code shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of these purposes and for the accomplishment of the purposes of the several divisions of this code, and in criminal actions the rule of construction set forth in Section 4 of the Penal Code shall be the rule of construction for this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

The provisions of this code, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing law, are restatements and continuations of existing law, and not new enactments. The enactment of this code shall not impair any privilege granted or right acquired under any of the laws of this state prior to the date it takes effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under any of the laws that are repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, continue to hold the offices according to their former tenure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

No action or proceeding which is commenced before this code takes effect, and no right which is accrued, is affected by any provision of this code, but all procedure thereafter taken in such action or proceeding shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

(a) Any person in whom the enforcement of any provision of this code is vested shall have the authority, as a public officer, to arrest, without a warrant, another person whenever such officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has, in his presence, violated any provision of this code, the violation of which is declared to be public offense. If such violation is a felony, or if the arresting officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has violated a provision of this code which is declared to be a felony, although no felony has in fact been committed, he may make an arrest although the violation or suspected violation did not occur in his presence. 

In any case in which an arrest is made pursuant to this authority for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor or an infraction, the arresting officer may, instead of taking the person arrested before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, unless the arrested person demands to be taken before a magistrate. The provisions of such chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(b) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any person, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) and within the scope of his authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest which is lawful or which the arresting officer, at the time of such arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful. No such officer shall be deemed an aggressor or lose his right to self-defense by the use of reasonable force to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance.

(c) Any person in whom the enforcement of any provision of this code is vested may serve all processes and notices throughout the state; provided, that county employees authorized to enforce the provisions of this code are authorized to serve processes and notices only within the boundaries of the county which employs them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

The district attorney of any county in which a violation of any provision of this code occurs shall, upon request of any enforcing officer or other interested person, prosecute such violation. The prosecutor of any municipality has concurrent jurisdiction as to any violation which is committed within his territorial jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Unless a different penalty is expressly provided, a violation of any provision of this code is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

Whenever any notice, report, statement, or record is required by this code, it shall be in writing unless it is expressly provided that it may be oral.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10.5.

It is unlawful for any person to alter any record or document in the office of a commissioner required to be filed pursuant to any provision of this code or pursuant to rules and regulations authorized by this code, without the approval of the commissioner or an authorized deputy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

Whenever any notice, report, statement, or record is required by this code to be kept or made in writing, it shall be in the English language.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, whenever any document is required or permitted by this code to be recorded, it shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property or thing which is affected is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

Whenever any power or authority is given by this code to any person, it may be exercised by any deputy, inspector, or agent who is duly authorized by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

Wherever, pursuant to this code, any state department, officer, board, agency, committee, or commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations, such regulations shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340 ) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to the extent that that chapter is not specifically in conflict with the express terms of the provisions of this code which authorize the adoption of such regulations. Those rules and regulations which are building standards, as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be adopted and approved pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the provision of this code under which the authority to adopt the specific building standard is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted prior to January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

The authority to adopt any rule, regulation, or rule and regulation which is vested in any state department, officer, board, agency, committee, or commission pursuant to this code includes the authority to amend or repeal the rule, regulation, or rule and regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

Whenever reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law of this state, the reference applies to all amendments and additions to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

Division, part, chapter, and article headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

If any provision of this code or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the code or the application of the provision to any other person or circumstance is not affected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

In all matters which arise under this code, proof of the fact of possession by any person engaged in the sale of a commodity establishes a rebuttable presumption that the commodity is for sale. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the present tense includes the past and future tenses, and the future, the present tense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

Inasmuch as the planned production of trees is distinguishable from the production of other products of the soil only in relation to the time elapsing before maturity, the production of trees shall be considered a branch of the agricultural industry of the state for the purposes of any law which provides for the benefit or protection of the agricultural industry of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

(a) Inasmuch as the planned production of trees, vines, rose bushes, ornamental plants, floricultural crops, and other horticultural crops is distinguishable from the production of other products of the soil only in relation to the time elapsing before maturity, plants and floricultural crops that are being produced by nurseries, whether in open fields or in greenhouses, shall be considered to be “growing agricultural crops” for the purpose of any laws that pertain to the agricultural industry of the state, and those laws shall apply equally to greenhouses and open field nursery operations.

(b) For the reasons stated in subdivision (a), a nursery where the primary activity is the planned production of horticultural crops, is a farm. However, for the purposes of this section and any laws that pertain to farms in this state, a retail nursery is not a farm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

23.5.

The commercial production of aquatic plants and animals propagated and raised by a registered aquaculturist pursuant to Section 15101 of the Fish and Game Code in the state is a growing industry and provides a healthful and nutritious food product, and, as a commercial operation, utilizes management, land, water, and feed as do other agricultural enterprises. Therefore, the commercial production of that aquatic life shall be considered a branch of the agricultural industry of the state for the purpose of any law that provides for the benefit or protection of the agricultural industry of the state except those laws relating to plant quarantine or pest control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

23.6.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that greenhouse production of floricultural, ornamental, or other nursery and agricultural products in the state is a growing industry that provides valuable agricultural products and year-round employment for agricultural workers. The Legislature further declares that greenhouse production is an efficient self-contained production system that offers protections for the environment and allows for the use of conservation-oriented production technologies, including drip irrigation, water recycling, and hydroponics, and the use of energy conservation systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

23.7.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that vermiculture in the state is a growing industry and that use of vermiculture and vermiculture by-products for the commercial purpose of producing agricultural commodities should be encouraged. As used in this section, “vermiculture” is the raising of animals belonging to the order Oligochaeta, class Chaetopoda, phylum Annelida.

Vermiculture, and the processing, packaging, sale, and use of its by-products, shall be considered a branch of the agricultural industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the provisions of this section are enacted in the exercise of the power of this state for the purpose of protecting and furthering the public health and welfare. It is further declared that the floriculture and nursery industry of this state is affected with a public interest, in that, among other things:

(a) The production, processing, manufacture, and distribution of floriculture and nursery products constitute a paramount industry of this state which not only provides substantial and required revenues for the state and its political subdivisions by tax revenues and other means, and employment and a means of livelihood for many thousands of its population, but also furnishes substantial employment to related industries that are vital to the public health and welfare.

(b) Basic research and development for floriculture and the nursery industries contribute substantially to food production in this state which is essential to the welfare and health of its citizens.

It is also declared that the elimination of disorderly marketing of California floricultural and nursery products, and the development of new and larger markets through education, promotion and other means for these products, are affected with the public interest.

(c) All production of floriculture and nursery products in greenhouses shall be deemed equivalent to the production of floricultural products in open fields.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

24.5.

Inasmuch as plants growing in native stands or planted for ornamental purposes contribute to the environmental and public health and welfare needs of the people of the state, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that such plants shall be considered as a part of the agricultural industry for the purpose of any law that provides for the protection of the agricultural industry from pests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1000.)
-------------------------------------------

25.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in the following sections govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25.5.

“Aquaculture” means that form of agriculture devoted to the propagation, cultivation, maintenance, harvesting, processing, distribution, and marketing of aquatic plants and animals in marine, brackish, and fresh water. “Aquaculture” does not include species of ornamental marine or freshwater plants and animals not utilized for human consumption or bait purposes that are maintained in closed systems for personal, pet industry, or hobby purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

“Commissioner” means any county agricultural commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

32.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 225.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

33.

“Greenhouse” means a structure covered with transparent or translucent materials for the purpose of admitting natural light and controlling the atmosphere for growing plants, including floricultural, ornamental, or other nursery and agricultural products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 605, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

35.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 42, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

36.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 43.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

38.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or any organized group of persons whether incorporated or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

39.

“Qualified representative of the commissioner” means a deputy commissioner or inspector who holds an appropriate certificate of qualification issued by the director as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2101) of Division 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

41.

“Section” means a section of this code, unless some other statute is specifically mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

44.

“Sell” includes offer for sale, expose for sale, possess for sale, exchange, barter, or trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

47.

“Shall” is mandatory, and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

49.

“Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

50.

Whenever the term “department” or “Department of Agriculture” appears in any law, it means the “Department of Food and Agriculture.”

Whenever the term “director,” “secretary,” “Director of Agriculture,” or “Secretary of Agriculture” appears in any law, it means the “Secretary of Food and Agriculture.”

Whenever the term “Agricultural Code” appears in any law, it means the “Food and Agricultural Code.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51.

(a) If, in connection with the use of roads, highways, and freeways, the assistance, control, or protection by Highway Patrol officers is desired, applications by an entity engaged in agricultural production to utilize services of Highway Patrol officers in the transportation of agricultural commodities shall be made to the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol. The commissioner may approve the application provided that employees are available and the department is fully reimbursed for additional costs incurred.

(b) Applications to utilize Highway Patrol employee services shall be approved or disapproved by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol within 30 days of receipt of the application and shall be approved sooner, if possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. STATE ADMINISTRATION [101. - 1501.]



PART 1. THE DEPARTMENT OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE [101. - 894.]



  CHAPTER 1. Organization [101. - 105.]

101.

There is in the state government the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 662.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

The department is under the control of a civil executive officer known as the Secretary of Food and Agriculture who shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. He or she shall be appointed by, and hold office at the pleasure of, the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 42, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

Except as is otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code governs and applies to the conduct of the department in every respect the same as if those provisions were set forth in this code, and whenever in that chapter the term “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, for the purpose of this code it means the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 42, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

The secretary may appoint and in accordance with law fix the salaries of such assistants, deputies, agents, experts, and other employees as are necessary for the administration of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 42, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

The chief of the division of the department who has jurisdiction over livestock and poultry disease control, meat inspection and dairy inspection and control shall officially designate a department employee as “State Veterinarian.” Such designated person shall be a graduate of a recognized college of veterinary medicine, be licensed to practice in this state, and have a state civil service classification of veterinary medical officer III or above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fiscal Duties and Powers [201. - 306.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [201. - 201.]

201.

The department may expend in accordance with law all money which is made available for its use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Department of Food and Agriculture Fund [221. - 227.]

221.

(a) The “Department of Food and Agriculture Fund,” which is a special fund, is continued in existence. Any moneys that are directed by law to be paid into the fund shall be paid into it and, unless otherwise specifically provided, shall be expended solely for the enforcement of the law under which the moneys were derived. The expenditure from the fund for the enforcement of any law shall not, unless otherwise specifically provided, exceed the amount of moneys that is credited to the fund pursuant to the law.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited into the fund under the provisions enumerated in subdivision (c) are hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years for expenditure in carrying out
 the purposes for which the moneys were deposited and for making the refunds authorized by Section 302.

(c) All moneys deposited into the fund under the provisions enumerated below are hereby exempted from Sections 13320 to 13324, inclusive, of the Government Code:

(1) Article 7 (commencing with Section 5821) and Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 5850) of Chapter 8 of Part 1 of Division 4, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6701) of Part 3 of Division 4, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 53301) of Division 18.

(2) Article 5 (commencing with Section 6001) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(3) Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 6047.1) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(4) Article 5 (commencing with Section 6981) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 4.

(5) Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 7401) of Part 4 of Division 4.

(6) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 14501), and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14901) of Division 7.

(7) Part 1 (commencing with Section 16301) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 17401) of Division 9.

(8) Sections 19225, 19227, 19312, and 19315.

(9) Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001).

(10) Division 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(11) Part 4 (commencing with Section 27501) of Division 12.

(12) Division 16 (commencing with Section 40501).

(13) Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 44971) of Division 17.

(14) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 52001) of Division 18.

(15) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 52251) of Division 18.

(16) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 52651) of Division 18.

(17) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 52851) of Division 18.

(18) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 55401), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56101), and Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section
 56701) of Division 20.

(19) Section 58582.

(20) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) of Part 3 of Division 21.

(21) Division 24 (commencing with Section 81000).

(22) Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 12531) of Division 5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(23) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12700) of Division 5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(24) Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 13400) and Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 13700) of Division 5 of the Business and Professions
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   (SB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

221.1.

Notwithstanding Section 221, the department shall establish all permanent positions with the Controller’s office, pursuant to standard state administrative practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (AB 222)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

222.

The director shall keep a separate record of the classes and sources of income which are credited to, and disbursed from, the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

223.

A sum not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) may, upon approval of the Department of Finance, be withdrawn from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used as a revolving fund by the department for the purposes for which the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

224.

Moneys transferred by the Controller to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account pursuant to Section 8352.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be expended by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture as follows:

(a) Of the amount transferred each fiscal year, nine million dollars ($9,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture for payment to the counties for pesticide use enforcement programs supervised by the Director of Pesticide Regulation. Reimbursement shall be apportioned to the counties in relation to each county’s expenditures to the total amount expended by all counties for the preceding fiscal year for pesticide use enforcement programs, as determined by the director, or with the collective agreement of the
 county agricultural commissioners, disbursement to counties for a current fiscal year according to criteria developed in work plans, or any combination of reimbursement and disbursement as agreed upon by the director and the county agricultural commissioners. The amount to be transferred to any county for a fiscal year may be increased or decreased by the director to compensate for incorrect previous transfers to that county, or adjusted based on evaluations of annual county Pesticide Enforcement Work Plans conducted by the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(b) Of the amount transferred each fiscal year, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture for state and county liaison activities and for departmental expenses directly related to administration of this section.

(c) Of the amount transferred each fiscal
 year, one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture for divisional and departmental overhead charges to the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(d) Of the amount transferred each fiscal year in excess of the amount transferred in the 2006–07 fiscal year, 7 percent is hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture for full disbursement to the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association, as specified in Section 2003, and individual counties. The funds dispersed to individual counties, pursuant to subdivision (g), shall be in a proportion to offset expenses associated with programs, personnel, and materials that ensure the uniform application of state agricultural policy or administer programs supervised by the secretary.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, of the amount
 transferred each fiscal year, three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby appropriated for distribution to counties in a manner prescribed by the secretary for pest detection or trapping programs. These funds are intended to supplement funds available for pest detection or trapping in the annual Budget Act. As a condition of receiving these funds, counties shall not reduce their level of support from any other funds for pest detection or trapping programs. If a county declines to participate in a pest detection or trapping program, or fails to conduct the program to the state’s satisfaction, the secretary shall reduce, by the amount that would otherwise be allocated to the county, funds available pursuant to this subdivision and any state allocations from the annual Budget Act. Those forfeited funds are hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture for purposes of operating the pest detection or trapping programs in those counties.

(f) (1) Of the amount transferred each fiscal year, three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Food and Agriculture to be used for emergency detection, investigation, or eradication of agricultural plant or animal pests or diseases during the fiscal year, upon approval of the Director of Finance. At the end of each fiscal year, any unencumbered balance of these funds shall be carried over to the next fiscal year, or at the discretion of the secretary, may be used for planning and research involving detection, investigation, eradication, and methods of quarantine compliance for agricultural plant or animal pests or diseases.

(2) The Department of Food and Agriculture shall develop policies, in consultation with the county agricultural commissioners and in compliance with any requirements of the annual Budget Act, to guide the ongoing use of these funds.

(g) The total amount transferred during each fiscal year less the amounts provided in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, and any moneys in reserve, is hereby appropriated for either or both of the following purposes:

(1) To be paid to the counties for agricultural programs authorized by this code that are supervised by the Department of Food and Agriculture and administered by county agricultural commissioners. Reimbursement shall be apportioned to the counties in relation to each county’s expenditures to the total amount expended by all counties for the preceding fiscal year for agricultural programs, as determined by the secretary, or with the collective agreement of the county agricultural commissioners, disbursement to counties according to criteria developed in work plans for a current fiscal year, or any combination of reimbursement and disbursement as agreed upon by the
 secretary and the county agricultural commissioners. The amount to be transferred to any county for a fiscal year may be increased or decreased by the secretary to provide that, insofar as those transferred unclaimed refundable gas tax funds for apportionment to the counties are available, no county shall receive smaller combined apportionments of gas taxes and unclaimed refundable gas taxes than that county would have received had the gas taxes been apportioned without the transfer required by Section 8352.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as determined by the secretary, except that the amount of unclaimed refundable gas tax funds to be transferred to any county for a fiscal year may be increased or decreased by the secretary to compensate for incorrect previous transfers to that county, and to account for any failure to meet the criteria listed in Section 224.5.

(2) To be expended by the Department of Food and Agriculture for statewide
 agricultural programs as agreed upon by the secretary and the county agricultural commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 4.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

224.5.

(a) In order to be eligible for the transfer specified in subdivision (g) of Section 224, counties must meet all of the following criteria, as determined by the secretary:

(1) Currently employ or contract with a licensed agricultural commissioner.

(2) Submit annual agricultural expenditure reports to the department in a timely manner.

(3) Maintain county general fund support for agricultural commissioner services at least equal to the average amount expended for the five preceding fiscal years, unless the county is facing unusual economic hardship that precludes that support.

(b) In the event that a county does not meet the criteria listed in subdivision (a) in a timely fashion, nothing shall preclude the secretary from completing transfers only to those counties that have met the criteria, while reserving funds for distribution to counties that may later be determined to have met them, or to set a date certain each fiscal year by which all available funds will be distributed to the counties that have met the criteria.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 421, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section operative July 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on all funds transferred from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and the Acala Cotton Fund for any purpose other than to carry out or enforce the law directly relating to the source of those funds, interest shall be paid to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund or the Acala Cotton Fund which otherwise would have been earned if the funds had not been transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1041, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11044 of the Government Code, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is hereby continuously appropriated from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund in each fiscal year to the department for litigation expenses incurred by the Bureau of Market Enforcement.

(b) At any time in a given fiscal year that the one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) appropriated for litigation costs in subdivision (a) is completely expended, the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and the General Fund shall share additional litigation costs on a basis of 20 percent paid by the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and 80 percent paid by the General Fund. These additional funds are to be used only when the bureau or the department is a defendant, or becomes a cross-defendant, in an action relating to market enforcement. 

(c) If a legal action is carried from one fiscal year to the next, the costs incurred in the following year shall not be charged against the one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) annually allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) to the bureau, but instead shall continue to be funded in the following years with 80 percent being paid by the General Fund and 20 percent being paid by the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(d) In civil actions in which the bureau is a party, the prevailing party may be awarded court costs and attorneys fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to avoid unnecessary charges and to provide for efficient program implementation, the fees and assessments required by law to be paid to the director or the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to support the agricultural programs specified in subdivision (b) of Section 230, except those specified in Article 5 (commencing with Section 6001) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4, Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 6047.1) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4, and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 44971) of Division 17, may be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, or with an entity that is (1) a bank or other depository approved by the Department of Finance, (2) a marketing order board or commission created pursuant to this code, or (3) another state agency, designated by the agricultural program’s advisory body, if any. The fees and assessments required by law to be paid to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund in Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 6047.1) of Chapter 9 of Part 1 of Division 4 may be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, or with an entity that is a bank or other depository approved by the Department of Finance. The director may designate that entity if an advisory body has not been created by statute for an agricultural program. All unencumbered funds in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and the Agriculture Trust Fund, including income therefrom, that have been collected pursuant to the agricultural program may also be deposited with the designated entity.

(b) The funds deposited with the designated entity shall be expended exclusively for the purpose of implementing and continuing the agricultural program for which they were collected.
